Wyoming, session 2026, HB0025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-16-1904(c)(iv) is repealed.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
1